District of Columbia statutes.
46-217

Limitations and priorities.

(a)

When there is more than 1 withholding order against a single obligor under this subchapter, the Collection and Disbursement Unit shall prorate the withholdings for current support among the orders up to the limits of § 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act (15 U.S.C. § 1673(b)).

(b)

If current support payments do not exceed the limits of section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act [15 U.S.C.§ 1673(b)], the Collection and Disbursement Unit shall prorate payments toward health insurance coverage, medical support, arrearages, and other costs and fees among the orders and prioritize these payments in accordance with § 46-251.08 and applicable federal requirements.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 18, 33 DCR 6710
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 108(q), 48 DCR 1270
May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-100, § 3(q), 53 DCR 1886
This section is referenced in § 46-214.
1981 Ed., § 30-517.
D.C. Law 13-269 substituted “Collection and Disbursement Unit” for “Court” throughout.
D.C. Law 16-100 rewrote subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) If current support payments do not exceed the limits of § 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act ( 15 U.S.C. § 1673(b)), payments toward arrearages shall be prorated by the Collection and Disbursement Unit among the orders.”
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7(p) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107(q) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107(q) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
Section 3(r) of D.C. Law 16-42, rewrote subsec. (b), to read as follows:
“(b) If current support payments do not exceed the limits of section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, the Collection and Disbursement Unit shall prorate payments toward health insurance coverage, medical support, arrearages, and other costs and fees among the orders and prioritize these payments in accordance with section 108 of the Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Amendment Act of 2004, effective March 30, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-130; D.C. Official Code § 46-251.08), and applicable federal requirements.”
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 16-42 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 7(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923), § 7(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 7(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 7(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 107(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 108(p) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3403(n) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3403(n) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(t) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-167, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7648).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(t) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-200, November 17, 2005, 52 DCR 10490).